fr: Température: Double; Haute; Basse; Autre
de: Temperatur: Zwei; Hoch; Niedrig; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Temperatură: Duală; Ridicată; Redusă; Altele
it: Temperatura: Doppia; Alta; Bassa; Altro
pt-PT: Temperatura: Duplo; Alto; Baixo; Outro
es: Temperatura: Doble; Alto; Bajo; Otros
nb: Temperatur: Dobbel; Høy; Lav; Annet
el: Θερμοκρασία: Διπλός; Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Άλλο
sv: Temperatur: Dubbel; Hög; Låg; Övrigt
cs: Teplota: Duální; Vysoký; Nízký; Jiné
lt-LT: Temperatūra: Dviguba; Aukšta; Žema; Kita
zh-CN: 温度: 双温区; 高; 低; 其他
ko: 온도: 듀얼; 높음; 낮음; 기타
hr-HR: Temperatura: Dvostruka; Visoka; Niska; Ostalo
da: Temperatur: Dobbelt; Høj; Lav; Andet
pt-BR: Temperatura: Dual; Alta; Baixa; Outro
hu: Hőmérséklet: Kettős; Magas; Alacsony; Egyéb
ru: Температура: Двойной; Высокая; Низкая; Другая
vi: Nhiệt độ: Hai nhiệt độ; Cao; Trễ; Khác
fi: Lämpötila: Kaksiosainen; Korkea; Matala; Muu
zh-TW: 溫度: 雙重; 高; 低; 其他
pl: Temperatura: Dual; Wysoki; Niski; Inne
th: อุณหภูมิ: คู่; เอวสูง; ต่ำ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Температура: Двойна; Висока; Ниска; Други
sk-SK: Teplota: Dvojitý; Vysoký; Nízky; Iné
tr: Sıcaklık: Çift; Yüksek; Düşük; Diğer
sl-SI: Temperatura: Dvojna; Visoka; Nizka; Drugo
ja: 温度: デュアル; 高; 低; その他
nl: Temperatuur: Dubbel; Hoog; Laag; Andere
en: Temperature: Dual; High; Low; Other